Illinois, session 104th, SB1827.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Sections 5-45020 and 5-45025 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-45020)7    Sec. 5-45020. Development of scope and performance 8criteria.9    (a) The county shall develop, with the assistance of a 10licensed design professional or public art designer, a request 11for proposal, which shall include scope and performance 12criteria. The scope and performance criteria must be in 13sufficient detail and contain adequate information to 14reasonably apprise the qualified design-build entities of the 15county's overall programmatic needs and goals, including 16criteria and preliminary design plans, general budget 17parameters, schedule, and delivery requirements.18    (b) Each request for proposal shall also include a 19description of the level of design to be provided in the 20proposals. This description must include the scope and type of 21renderings, drawings, and specifications that, at a minimum, 22will be required by the county to be produced by the 23design-build entities.   SB1827 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1    (c) The scope and performance criteria shall be prepared 2by a design professional or public art designer who is an 3employee of the county, or the county may contract with an 4independent design professional or public art designer 5selected under the Local Government Professional Services 6Selection Act to provide these services. 7    (d) The design professional or public art designer that 8prepares the scope and performance criteria is prohibited from 9participating in any design-build entity proposal for the 10project. 11    (e) The design-build contract may be conditioned upon 12subsequent refinements in scope and price and may allow the 13county to make modifications in the project scope without 14invalidating the design-build contract. 15(Source: P.A. 102-954, eff. 1-1-23.) 16    (55 ILCS 5/5-45025)17    Sec. 5-45025. Procedures for Selection.18    (a) The county must use a two-phase procedure for the 19selection of the successful design-build entity. Phase I of 20the procedure will evaluate and shortlist the design-build 21entities based on qualifications, and Phase II will evaluate 22the technical and cost proposals.23    (b) The county shall include in the request for proposal 24the evaluating factors to be used in Phase I. These factors are 25in addition to any prequalification requirements of   SB1827 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1design-build entities that the county has set forth. Each 2request for proposal shall establish the relative importance 3assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, including 4any weighting of criteria to be employed by the county. The 5county must maintain a record of the evaluation scoring to be 6disclosed in event of a protest regarding the solicitation. 7    The county shall include the following criteria in every 8Phase I evaluation of design-build entities: (i) experience of 9personnel; (ii) successful experience with similar project 10types; (iii) financial capability; (iv) timeliness of past 11performance; (v) experience with similarly sized projects; 12(vi) successful reference checks of the firm; (vii) commitment 13to assign personnel for the duration of the project and 14qualifications of the entity's consultants; and (viii) ability 15or past performance in meeting or exhausting good faith 16efforts to meet the utilization goals for business enterprises 17established in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, 18and Persons with Disabilities Act and with Section 2-105 of 19the Illinois Human Rights Act. The county may include any 20additional relevant criteria in Phase I that it deems 21necessary for a proper qualification review. 22    The county may not consider any design-build entity for 23evaluation or award if the entity has any pecuniary interest 24in the project or has other relationships or circumstances, 25including, but not limited to, long-term leasehold, mutual 26performance, or development contracts with the county, that   SB1827 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1may give the design-build entity a financial or tangible 2advantage over other design-build entities in the preparation, 3evaluation, or performance of the design-build contract or 4that create the appearance of impropriety. A design-build 5entity shall not be disqualified under this Section solely due 6to having previously been awarded a project or projects under 7any applicable public procurement statute of the State. No 8proposal shall be considered that does not include an entity's 9plan to comply with the requirements established in the 10Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 11Disabilities Act, for both the design and construction areas 12of performance, and with Section 2-105 of the Illinois Human 13Rights Act. The proposal shall disclose the role of a licensed 14design professional during the administration of the 15design-build contract. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit 16a county from engaging a licensed design professional during 17the administration of a design-build contract if the county 18believes that engaging the licensed design professional 19benefits the project. 20    Upon completion of the qualifications evaluation, the 21county shall create a shortlist of the most highly qualified 22design-build entities. The county, in its discretion, is not 23required to shortlist the maximum number of entities as 24identified for Phase II evaluation, provided that no less than 252 design-build entities nor more than 6 are selected to submit 26Phase II proposals. If a county receives one response to Phase   SB1827 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1I, nothing in this Section shall prohibit the county from 2proceeding with a Phase II evaluation of the single respondent 3if the county, in its discretion, finds proceeding to be in its 4best interest. 5    The county shall notify the entities selected for the 6shortlist in writing. This notification shall commence the 7period for the preparation of the Phase II technical and cost 8evaluations. The county must allow sufficient time for the 9shortlist entities to prepare their Phase II submittals 10considering the scope and detail requested by the county. 11    (c) The county shall include in the request for proposal 12the evaluating factors to be used in the technical and cost 13submission components of Phase II. Each request for proposal 14shall establish, for both the technical and cost submission 15components of Phase II, the relative importance assigned to 16each evaluation factor and subfactor, including any weighting 17of criteria to be employed by the county. The county must 18maintain a record of the evaluation scoring to be disclosed in 19event of a protest regarding the solicitation. 20    The county shall include the following criteria in every 21Phase II technical evaluation of design-build entities: (i) 22compliance with objectives of the project; (ii) compliance of 23proposed services to the request for proposal requirements; 24(iii) quality of products or materials proposed; (iv) quality 25of design parameters; (v) design concepts; (vi) innovation in 26meeting the scope and performance criteria; and (vii)   SB1827 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1constructability of the proposed project. The county may 2include any additional relevant technical evaluation factors 3it deems necessary for proper selection. 4    The county shall include the following criteria in every 5Phase II cost evaluation: the total project cost, the 6construction costs, and the time of completion. The county may 7include any additional relevant technical evaluation factors 8it deems necessary for proper selection. The total project 9cost criteria weighting factor shall not exceed 30%. 10    The county shall directly employ or retain a licensed 11design professional or a public art designer to evaluate the 12technical and cost submissions to determine if the technical 13submissions are in accordance with generally accepted industry 14standards. Upon completion of the technical submissions and 15cost submissions evaluation, the county may award the 16design-build contract to the highest overall ranked entity. 17(Source: P.A. 102-954, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 18    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 19changing Sections 11-39.2-20 and 11-39.2-25 as follows: 20    (65 ILCS 5/11-39.2-20)21    Sec. 11-39.2-20. Development of scope and performance 22criteria.23    (a) The municipality must develop, with the assistance of 24a licensed design professional or public art designer, a   SB1827 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1request for proposal, which must include scope and performance 2criteria. The scope and performance criteria must be in 3sufficient detail and contain adequate information to 4reasonably apprise the qualified design-build entities of the 5municipality's overall programmatic needs and goals, including 6criteria and preliminary design plans, general budget 7parameters, schedule, and delivery requirements.8    (b) Each request for proposal must also include a 9description of the level of design to be provided in the 10proposals. This description must include the scope and type of 11renderings, drawings, and specifications that, at a minimum, 12will be required by the municipality to be produced by the 13design-build entities. 14    (c) The scope and performance criteria must be prepared by 15a design professional or public art designer who is an 16employee of the municipality, or the municipality may contract 17with an independent design professional or public art designer 18selected under the Local Government Professional Services 19Selection Act to provide these services. 20    (d) The design professional or public art designer that 21prepares the scope and performance criteria is prohibited from 22participating in any design-build entity proposal for the 23project. 24    (e) The design-build contract may be conditioned upon 25subsequent refinements in scope and price and may allow the 26municipality to make modifications in the project scope   SB1827 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1without invalidating the design-build contract. 2(Source: P.A. 103-491, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (65 ILCS 5/11-39.2-25)4    Sec. 11-39.2-25. Procedures for Selection.5    (a) The municipality must use a two-phase procedure for 6the selection of the successful design-build entity. Phase I 7of the procedure will evaluate and shortlist the design-build 8entities based on qualifications, and Phase II will evaluate 9the technical and cost proposals.10    (b) The municipality must include in the request for 11proposal the evaluating factors to be used in Phase I. These 12factors are in addition to any prequalification requirements 13of design-build entities that the municipality has set forth. 14Each request for proposal must establish the relative 15importance assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, 16including any weighting of criteria to be employed by the 17municipality. The municipality must maintain a record of the 18evaluation scoring to be disclosed in event of a protest 19regarding the solicitation. 20    The municipality must include the following criteria in 21every Phase I evaluation of design-build entities: (i) 22experience of personnel; (ii) successful experience with 23similar project types; (iii) financial capability; (iv) 24timeliness of past performance; (v) experience with similarly 25sized projects; (vi) successful reference checks of the firm;   SB1827 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1(vii) commitment to assign personnel for the duration of the 2project and qualifications of the entity's consultants; and 3(viii) ability or past performance in meeting or exhausting 4good faith efforts to meet the utilization goals for business 5enterprises established in the Business Enterprise for 6Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act and with 7Section 2-105 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. The 8municipality may include any additional, relevant criteria in 9Phase I that it deems necessary for a proper qualification 10review. 11    The municipality may not consider any design-build entity 12for evaluation or award if the entity has any pecuniary 13interest in the project or has other relationships or 14circumstances, such as long-term leasehold, mutual 15performance, or development contracts with the municipality, 16that may give the design-build entity a financial or tangible 17advantage over other design-build entities in the preparation, 18evaluation, or performance of the design-build contract or 19that create the appearance of impropriety. A design-build 20entity shall not be disqualified under this Section solely due 21to having previously been awarded a project or projects under 22any applicable public procurement statute of the State. No 23proposal may be considered that does not include an entity's 24plan to comply with the requirements established in the 25Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 26Disabilities Act, for both the design and construction areas   SB1827 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1of performance, and with Section 2-105 of the Illinois Human 2Rights Act. The proposal shall disclose the role of a licensed 3design professional during the administration of the 4design-build contract. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit 5a municipality from engaging a licensed design professional 6during the administration of a design-build contract if the 7municipality believes that engaging the licensed design 8professional benefits the project. 9    Upon completion of the qualification evaluation, the 10municipality must create a shortlist of the most highly 11qualified design-build entities. The municipality, in its 12discretion, is not required to shortlist the maximum number of 13entities as identified for Phase II evaluation if no less than 142 design-build entities nor more than 6 are selected to submit 15Phase II proposals. If a municipality receives one response to 16Phase I, nothing in this Section shall prohibit the 17municipality from proceeding with a Phase II evaluation of the 18single respondent if the municipality, in its discretion, 19finds proceeding to be in its best interest. 20    The municipality must notify the entities selected for the 21shortlist in writing. This notification must commence the 22period for the preparation of the Phase II technical and cost 23evaluations. The municipality must allow sufficient time for 24the shortlist entities to prepare their Phase II submittals 25considering the scope and detail requested by the 26municipality.   SB1827 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1    (c) The municipality must include in the request for 2proposal the evaluating factors to be used in the technical 3and cost submission components of Phase II. Each request for 4proposal must establish, for both the technical and cost 5submission components of Phase II, the relative importance 6assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, including 7any weighting of criteria to be employed by the municipality. 8The municipality must maintain a record of the evaluation 9scoring to be disclosed in event of a protest regarding the 10solicitation. 11    The municipality must include the following criteria in 12every Phase II technical evaluation of design-build entities: 13(i) compliance with objectives of the project; (ii) compliance 14of proposed services to the request for proposal requirements; 15(iii) quality of products or materials proposed; (iv) quality 16of design parameters; (v) design concepts; (vi) innovation in 17meeting the scope and performance criteria; and (vii) 18constructability of the proposed project. The municipality may 19include any additional relevant technical evaluation factors 20it deems necessary for proper selection. 21    The municipality must include the following criteria in 22every Phase II cost evaluation: the total project cost, the 23construction costs, and the time of completion. The 24municipality may include any additional relevant technical 25evaluation factors it deems necessary for proper selection. 26The total project cost criteria weighting factor may not   SB1827 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1exceed 30%. 2    The municipality must directly employ or retain a licensed 3design professional or a public art designer to evaluate the 4technical and cost submissions to determine if the technical 5submissions are in accordance with generally accepted industry 6standards. Upon completion of the technical submissions and 7cost submissions evaluation, the municipality may award the 8design-build contract to the highest overall ranked entity. 9(Source: P.A. 103-491, eff. 1-1-24.) 10    Section 15. The Fire Protection District Act is amended by 11changing Section 11k as follows: 12    (70 ILCS 705/11k)13    Sec. 11k. Competitive bidding; notice requirements.14    (a) The board of trustees shall have the power to acquire 15by gift, legacy, or purchase any personal property necessary 16for its corporate purposes provided that all contracts for 17supplies, materials, or work involving an expenditure in 18excess of $20,000 shall be let to the lowest responsible 19bidder after advertising as required under subsection (b) of 20this Section; except that, if the board of trustees seeks to 21purchase equipment directly from a dealer or an original 22manufacturer in excess of $50,000, then the contract for 23purchase shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder after 24advertising as required under subsection (b) of this Section.   SB1827 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1The board is not required to accept a bid that does not meet 2the district's established specifications, terms of delivery, 3quality, and serviceability requirements. Contracts which, by 4their nature, are not adapted to award by competitive bidding, 5are not subject to competitive bidding, including, but not 6limited to:7        (1) contracts for the services of individuals 8    possessing a high degree of professional skill where the 9    ability or fitness of the individual plays an important 10    part;11        (2) contracts for the printing of finance committee 12    reports and departmental reports;13        (3) contracts for the printing or engraving of bonds, 14    tax warrants, and other evidences of indebtedness;15        (4) contracts for the maintenance or servicing of, or 16    provision of repair parts for, equipment which are made 17    with the manufacturer or authorized service agent of that 18    equipment where the provision of parts, maintenance, or 19    servicing can best be performed by the manufacturer or 20    authorized service agent, or which involve proprietary 21    parts or technology not otherwise available;22        (5) purchases and contracts for the use, purchase, 23    delivery, movement, or installation of data processing 24    equipment, software, or services and telecommunications 25    and interconnect equipment, software, and services;26        (6) contracts for duplicating machines and supplies;  SB1827 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1        (7) contracts for utility services such as water, 2    light, heat, telephone or telegraph;3        (8) contracts for goods or services procured from 4    another governmental agency;5        (9) purchases of equipment previously owned by some 6    entity other than the district itself; and7        (10) contracts for goods or services which are 8    economically procurable from only one source, such as for 9    the purchase of magazines, books, periodicals, pamphlets, 10    reports, and online subscriptions.11    Contracts for emergency expenditures are also exempt from 12competitive bidding when the emergency expenditure is approved 13by a vote of 3/4 of the members of the board.14    (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) of this 15Section, all proposals to award contracts involving amounts in 16excess of $20,000 shall be published at least 10 days, 17excluding Sundays and legal holidays, in advance of the date 18announced for the receiving of bids, in a secular English 19language newspaper of general circulation throughout the 20district. In addition, a fire protection district that has a 21website that the full-time staff of the district maintains 22shall post notice on its website of all proposals to award 23contracts in excess of $20,000. Advertisements for bids shall 24describe the character of the proposed contract or agreement 25in sufficient detail to enable the bidders thereon to know 26what their obligations will be, either in the advertisement   SB1827 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1itself, or by reference to detailed plans and specifications 2on file at the time of the publication of the first 3announcement. Such advertisement shall also state the date, 4time and place assigned for the opening of bids, and no bids 5shall be received at any time subsequent to the time indicated 6in the announcement. All competitive bids for contracts 7involving an expenditure in excess of $20,000 must be sealed 8by the bidder and must be opened by a member of the board or an 9employee of the district at a public bid opening at which the 10contents of the bids must be announced. Each bidder must 11receive at least 3 days' notice of the time and place of the 12bid opening.13    (c) In addition to contracts entered into under the 14Governmental Joint Purchasing Act, a board of trustees may 15enter into contracts for supplies, materials, or work 16involving an expenditure in excess of $20,000 through 17participation in a joint governmental or nongovernmental 18purchasing program that requires as part of its selection 19procedure a competitive solicitation and procurement process.20    (d) Subject to the exceptions under subsections (a) and 21(c), any procurement by a board of trustees involving the 22acquisition, by direct or beneficial ownership, of 23improvements to real estate by a fire protection district 24which results in an expenditure of district funds in excess of 25$20,000 must be competitively bid in accordance with the 26procedures of subsection (b).   SB1827 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10100 JDS 20172 b1    (e) Nothing in this Section prohibits a fire protection 2district from entering into design-build contracts. Fire 3protection districts are authorized to use a design-build 4contracting method for construction if a competitive process 5consistent with the purpose of this Section is used in 6connection with the selection of the design-builder. 7(Source: P.A. 102-138, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff 8-20-21; 8103-634, eff. 1-1-25.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.